Utah statutes.
31A-22-719.   Mastectomy coverage.
(1)  A group policy subject to Section 31A-22-630 may not deny a person's
eligibility or continued eligibility to enroll or renew coverage under the
terms of the group policy plan solely for the purpose of avoiding the
requirements of this section or Section 31A-22-630.
(2)  A group policy subject to Section 31A-22-630 may not do any of the
following to induce a provider to provide care to an insured in a manner
inconsistent with this section or Section 31A-22-630:
(a)  penalize or otherwise reduce or limit the reimbursement of an attending
provider; or
(b)  provide incentives to an attending provider whether or not the incentives
are monetary.
